src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-ys_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - balamys : #  ys-stem
    balamys+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: balamys
    balamys+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: balamys
    balamys+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: balamyske
    balamys+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: balamysta
    balamys+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: balamyha
    balamys+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: balamysko
    balamys+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [balamyskiiro, balamyskiiri, balamyskiire]
    balamys+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: balamyja
    balamys+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: balamyjen
    balamys+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: balamyjenge
    balamys+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: balamyjenna
    balamys+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: balamyjensa
    balamys+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: balamyjengo
    balamys+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [balamyjengiiro, balamyjengiiri, balamyjengiire]
